Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-3704
College Pathway Program Act; annual report; rules and regulations.

(1) On or before December 1, 2024, and each December 1 thereafter, the State Department of Education shall electronically submit a report to the Clerk of the Legislature regarding the College Pathway Program Act, including, but not limited to, the recipients of funding and evaluations of the effectiveness of the program.

(2) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the College Pathway Program Act.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB937, § 19.
July 18, 2026